Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,112
Income tax; taxpayer; bankruptcy; Tax Commissioner; tax; assessment; collection.

(1) Upon the adjudication of bankruptcy of any taxpayer in any bankruptcy proceeding or the appointment of a receiver for any taxpayer in any receivership proceeding before any court of the United States or any state or territory or of the District of Columbia, any deficiency, together with additions to tax and interest provided by law, determined by the Tax Commissioner, may be immediately assessed.

(2) Claims for the deficiency and such additions to income tax and interest may be presented, for adjudication in accordance with law, to the court before which the bankruptcy or receivership proceeding is pending, despite the pendency of a protest before the Tax Commissioner under the provisions of section 77-2778. No protest against a proposed assessment shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner after the adjudication of bankruptcy or appointment of the receiver.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 112, p. 1626.